apertium-bre.bre.dix
    <pardef n="debr/iñ__vblex">
      <e><p><l>iñ</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>et</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ez</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>omp</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>it</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ont</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>er</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>en</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>emp</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ec’h</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ent</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ed</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jout</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jomp</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>joc’h</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jont</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jod</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>in</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>imp</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ot</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>oc’h</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>int</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>or</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fen</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fes</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fe</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>femp</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fec’h</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fent</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fed</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jen</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jes</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>je</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jemp</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jec’h</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jent</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jed</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>et</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>omp</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>it</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ent</l><r>iñ<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="enbroiñ" r="LR"><i>enbro</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aberzhiñ"><i>aberzh</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="addeskiñ"><i>addesk</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="adkreskiñ"><i>adkresk</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="adneveziñ"><i>adnevez</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="adunaniñ"><i>adunan</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aheurtiñ"><i>aheurt</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aloubiñ"><i>aloub</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="amgrediñ"><i>amgred</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="amprestiñ" r="LR"><i>amprest</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="anouediñ"><i>anoued</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aprouiñ"><i>aprou</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="arc’hantaouiñ"><i>arc’hantaou</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="arnodiñ"><i>arnod</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="asantiñ"><i>asant</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aveiñ"><i>ave</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="azpediñ"><i>azped</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="badeziñ"><par n="initial-b"/><i>adez</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="belegiñ"><par n="initial-b"/><i>eleg</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bevenniñ"><par n="initial-b"/><i>evenn</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="beviñ" r="LR"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ev</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="brasjediñ"><par n="initial-b"/><i>rasjed</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="brezhonegiñ" r="LR"><par n="initial-b"/><i>rezhoneg</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="brudiñ" r="LR"><par n="initial-b"/><i>rud</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="budjediñ"><par n="initial-b"/><i>udjed</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="butuniñ"><par n="initial-b"/><i>utun</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="danevelliñ" r="LR"><par n="initial-d"/><i>anevell</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="daouhanteriñ"><par n="initial-d"/><i>aouhanter</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dareviñ"><par n="initial-d"/><i>arev</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dasorc’hiñ"><par n="initial-d"/><i>asorc’h</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dekvedenniñ"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ekvedenn</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="deskiñ"><par n="initial-d"/><i>esk</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dezrevelliñ" r="LR"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ezrevell</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dibuniñ" r="LR"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ibun</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="diduiñ" r="LR"><par n="initial-d"/><i>idu</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dieubiñ"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ieub</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="difuiñ"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ifu</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="digoriñ" r="LR"><par n="initial-d"/><i>igor</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="digreskiñ"><par n="initial-d"/><i>igresk</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dimeziñ"><par n="initial-d"/><i>imez</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dinec’hiñ"><par n="initial-d"/><i>inec’h</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dioueriñ"><par n="initial-d"/><i>iouer</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="disleberiñ"><par n="initial-d"/><i>isleber</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="disodiñ"><par n="initial-d"/><i>isod</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dizaoniñ"><par n="initial-d"/><i>izaon</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dizimeziñ"><par n="initial-d"/><i>izimez</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="dozviñ"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ozv</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ebarzhiñ"><i>ebarzh</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="elumiñ" r="LR"><i>elum</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="enaouiñ"><i>enaou</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="enkontammiñ"><i>enkontamm</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="enoriñ"><i>enor</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
     <e lm="ergerzhiñ" r="LR"><i>ergerzh</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="euveriñ"><i>euver</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="feriñ"><i>fer</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="forc’hiñ"><i>forc’h</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="frealziñ"><i>frealz</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="garmiñ"><par n="initial-g"/><i>arm</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="goudoriñ"><par n="initial-g"/><i>oudor</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gwarediñ"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>ared</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gwerzaouiñ"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>erzaou</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="harpiñ" r="LR"><i>harp</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hetiñ"><i>het</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="huanadiñ"><i>huanad</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="jaojiñ" r="LR"><i>jaoj</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="kaniñ" r="LR"><par n="initial-k"/><i>an</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kartennaouiñ"><par n="initial-k"/><i>artennaou</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kemberiñ"><par n="initial-k"/><i>ember</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kevraouiñ"><par n="initial-k"/><i>evraou</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kimiadiñ"><par n="initial-k"/><i>imiad</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="korvoiñ"><par n="initial-k"/><i>orvo</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="kreizenniñ" r="LR"><par n="initial-k"/><i>reizenn</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="krogiñ" r="LR"><par n="initial-k"/><i>rog</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kurunenniñ" r="LR"><par n="initial-k"/><i>urunenn</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="lesanviñ" r="LR"><i>lesanv</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lodenniñ" r="LR"><i>lodenn</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lugerniñ"><i>lugern</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="medalenniñ"><par n="initial-m"/><i>edalenn</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="milkementiñ"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ilkement</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="morenniñ"><par n="initial-m"/><i>orenn</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="neveziñ"><i>nevez</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ogediñ"><i>oged</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pasiñ" r="LR"><par n="initial-p"/><i>as</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="permetiñ" r="LR"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ermet</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="plediñ"><par n="initial-p"/><i>led</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="prezegenniñ"><par n="initial-p"/><i>rezegenn</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="prouiñ"><par n="initial-p"/><i>rou</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="rastelliñ" r="LR"><i>rastell</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="repuiñ"><i>repu</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="saludiñ"><i>salud</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sec’hiñ"><i>sec’h</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="skanniñ"><i>skann</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sodiñ"><i>sod</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="stouiñ"><i>stou</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="taliñ" r="LR"><par n="initial-t"/><i>al</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="teuliaouiñ"><par n="initial-t"/><i>euliaou</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="touiñ"><par n="initial-t"/><i>ou</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="treuziñ"><par n="initial-t"/><i>reuz</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="unvaniñ"><i>unvan</i><par n="debr/iñ__vblex"/></e>
